Nevada, session 83, AB69.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Section 23 of chapter 545, Statutes of Nevada 2007,
at page 3428, as amended by chapter 623, Statutes of Nevada 2019,
at page 4192, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 23. 1. This section and sections 3 to 22,
inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purposes of
enacting ordinances and performing any other preparatory
administrative tasks that are necessary to carry out the
provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2007, for all other purposes.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective on
October 1, 2007.
[3. Sections 3 to 22, inclusive, of this act expire by
limitation on October 1, 2027.]
Sec. 2. Section 28 of chapter 387, Statutes of Nevada 2009, at
page 2104, as amended by chapter 623, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at
page 4192, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 28. 1. This section and sections 4, 18 and 27 of
this act become effective upon passage and approval.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. Sections 2, 3, 5, 6, 7, 9, 11 to 16, inclusive, and 19 to
26, inclusive, of this act become effective on July 1, 2009.
3. Section 17 of this act becomes effective on July 1,
2011.
4. [Section 25 of this act expires by limitation on
September 30, 2027.
5.] Sections 7 and 9 of this act expire by limitation on
September 30, 2029.
[6.] 5. Sections 8 and 10 of this act become effective on
October 1, 2029.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)